Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB452.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 20.1. Amnesty for Disciplinary Actions Regarding COVID-19 Protocols.--Any disciplinary action taken, penalty paid or violation noted in a report of inspection by a local board or department of health, the department or by the Department of Agriculture on a retail food facility as defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 5702 (relating 123456789101112131415161718192021 to definitions) for failure to comply with any of the following during the period when the Governor's proclamation of disaster emergency issued on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020), was in effect shall be removed from the official record, and in the case of a penalty paid, shall be refunded:(1) The provisions of section 5 or an order by the secretary under section 5.(2) A proclamation or order of the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(f)(7) (relating to general authority of Governor), section 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," or section 2102(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(3) An order of the secretary under section 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) or 2106 of The Administrative Code of 1929, or 28 Pa. Code § 27.60 (relating to disease control measures), 27.61 (relating to isolation), 27.65 (relating to quarantine), 27.66 (relating to placarding), 27.67 (relating to movement of persons and animals subject to isolation or quarantine by action of a local health authority or the department) or 27.68 (relating to release from isolation or quarantine), which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(4) Guidance issued by the department or the Department of Human Services relating to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."20250HB0452PN0429 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0452PN0429 - 3 - 1